trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="afalag/ar-se__vblex">
      
  <e>       <p><l>aríem</l>     <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aria</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aríeu</l>     <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aries</l>     <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>arien</l>     <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aria</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>arem</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aré</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>areu</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aràs</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aran</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>arà</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>àrem</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uí</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>àreu</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ares</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aren</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>à</l>         <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uem</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uem</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ueu</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>au</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ueu</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>au</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__agafa"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uin</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uen</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uin</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uen</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ui</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ui</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>àvem</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ava</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>àveu</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aves</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aven</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ava</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uéssim</l>    <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>àrem</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ués</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ara</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uéssiu</l>    <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>àreu</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uessis</l>    <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ares</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uessin</l>    <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aren</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ués</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ara</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ades</l>      <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ada</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ats</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uem</l>       <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ar-se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pron"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      

<e lm="aplegar-se">      <i>apleg</i><par n="afalag/ar-se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arrossegar-se">   <i>arrosseg</i><par n="afalag/ar-se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="congregar-se">    <i>congreg</i><par n="afalag/ar-se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desempallegar-se"><i>desempalleg</i><par n="afalag/ar-se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="empantanegar-se"> <i>empantaneg</i><par n="afalag/ar-se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enfangar-se">     <i>enfang</i><par n="afalag/ar-se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esllenegar-se">   <i>eslleneg</i><par n="afalag/ar-se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ofegar-se">       <i>ofeg</i><par n="afalag/ar-se__vblex"/></e>
